Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 1. Generally

§ 35-9-101.
Department created.

The department of fire prevention and electrical safety is created.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.1; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1.

Purpose of bill. —

Section 5, ch. 31, Laws 1982, reads: “The purpose of this bill is to reaffirm the reestablishment of the above agencies notwithstanding the approval by the Governor of Chapter 126, Wyoming Session Laws 1981, on a date later than the approval of Chapters 32, 50, 84 and 85, Wyoming Session Laws 1981, and to conform the reestablishment of such agencies with the amendment to [former] W.S. 28-10-103(b) made by Chapter 126, by removing the six year term of reestablishment.”

Fire training study. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 336, as added by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4, appropriates $35,000 from the general fund to the department of fire prevention and electrical safety to provide a report that identifies (1) fire suppression training needs of all Wyoming firefighters; (2) alternatives for providing the identified training needs; and (3) estimated costs of each of the alternatives. The report is to be made to the joint interim corporations, elections and political subdivisions committee by November 1, 2005.

§ 35-9-102.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

35-9-101

through

35-9-130

:

“Apprentice electrician” means a person who has insufficient qualifications to be a journeyman electrician and is hired by a licensed electrical contractor to assist a licensed journeyman or master electrician. An apprentice electrician must be registered with the department of fire prevention and electrical safety and must be enrolled in a bona fide program of training approved by the bureau of apprenticeship and training, United States department of labor, or present evidence directly to the department that he is enrolled in an apprentice training program which provides training equivalent to a program approved by the bureau of apprenticeship and training, United States department of labor;

“Apprentice technician” means a person who has insufficient qualifications to be a low voltage or a limited technician and is hired by a licensed electrical contractor, low voltage contractor, or limited contractor to assist a licensed low voltage or limited technician. An apprentice technician must be registered with the department of fire prevention and electrical safety and must be enrolled in a training program as approved by the department;

“Board” means the electrical board;

“Council” means the council on fire prevention and electrical safety in buildings;

“Department” means the department of fire prevention and electrical safety;

“Electrical contractor” means a person licensed by the department to contract with another to plan, lay out and supervise the installation of electric equipment. “Electrical contractor” excludes a person who only plans or designs electrical installations;

“Full-time paid fire fighters” means an individual regularly employed for devoting his entire time of employment to the care, operation and requirements of a regularly constituted fire department;

“Installation of electric equipment” includes installing, altering and repairing the wiring of apparatus equipment and conductors subject to the National Electrical Code;

“Journeyman electrician” means a person licensed by the department who has four (4) years experience in the electrical wiring industry and technical knowledge to install and supervise the installation of electrical equipment for any purpose in accordance with the National Electrical Code and city, county and state ordinances and regulations;

“Limited electrical contractor” means a person, licensed by the department to contract with another to plan, lay out and supervise the installation of electrical equipment associated with the type of limited electrical contractor license held. “Limited electrical contractor” excludes a person who only plans or designs electrical installations;

“Limited technician” means a person licensed by the department who has met the minimum experience requirements as prescribed by board rules and regulations in the portion of the electrical wiring industry covered by his limited license. The limited technician shall have technical knowledge to install and supervise the installation of electrical equipment associated with the type of limited electrical license held in accordance with the National Electrical Code and city, county and state ordinances and regulations;

“Low voltage electrical contractor” means a person licensed by the department to contract with another to plan, lay out and supervise the installation of electrical equipment associated with the type of limited electrical contractor license held. “Low voltage electrical contractor” excludes a person who only plans or designs electrical installations;

“Low voltage technician” means a person licensed by the department who has met the minimum experience requirements as prescribed by board rules and regulations in the portion of the electrical wiring industry covered by his low voltage license. The low voltage technician shall have technical knowledge to install and supervise the installation of electrical equipment associated with the type of low voltage electrical license held in accordance with the National Electrical Code and city, county and state ordinances and regulations;

“Master electrician” means a person licensed by the department who has eight (8) years experience in the electrical wiring industry and technical knowledge to plan, lay out and supervise the installation of electric equipment in accordance with the National Electrical Code and city, county and state ordinances and regulations;

“Master electrician of record” means a Wyoming licensed master electrician who is actively employed by a licensed electrical contractor in a full-time capacity, and who assumes responsibility to ensure that the National Electrical Code, W.S.

35-9-120

through

35-9-130

and applicable rules of the department of fire prevention and electrical safety are adhered to on all electrical work undertaken by the electrical contractor in the state of Wyoming, and who is not the master electrician of record for, or employed by, any other electrical contractor;

“Owner” means the person holding legal title to a building or real property;

“Public building” means a building intended for access by the general public;

“Remodeling” includes repairing, altering or adding to a building or its electrical system;

“Technician of record” means a Wyoming licensed low voltage or limited technician who is actively employed by a licensed low voltage or limited electrical contractor in a full-time capacity, and who assumes responsibility to ensure that the National Electrical Code, W.S.

35-9-120

through 35-9-130 and applicable rules of the department of fire prevention and electrical safety are adhered to on all low voltage or limited electrical work undertaken by the low voltage or limited electrical contractor in the state of Wyoming, and who is not the technician of record for, or employed by, any other low voltage or limited electrical contractor.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 35-436.27, 35-436.32; W.S. 1977, §§

35-9-127

, 35-9-133; Laws 1979, ch. 136, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 2003, ch. 49, § 2; 2010, ch. 84, § 2; 2015 ch. 158, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted “From and after March 1, 1994” at the beginning of the second sentence of (a)(i); and substituted “department” for “board” in (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, divided the existing sentence into two sentences , and substituted “met the minimum experience requirements as prescribed by board rules and regulations” for “two (2) years experience” in the first sentence
in
(a)(xi) and (a)(xiii); in (a)(xi), added “The limited technician shall have” at the beginning of the second sentence ; in (a)(xiii), added “The low voltage technician shall have” at the beginning of the second sentence; and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-9-103.
Divisions created; council and board created.

There are created within the department:

The division of fire prevention;

The division of electrical safety;

The council on fire prevention and electrical safety in buildings;

The electrical board.

The council consists of five (5) members appointed by the governor for six (6) year terms which commence on April 1 following appointment. One (1) member shall be appointed to represent each of the following: counties or municipalities, fire fighters, the electrical board, an association of architects or an association of general contractors and the general public. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term. When new appointments are made, the council shall select a chairman, a vice chairman and a secretary. A quorum consists of three (3) members. The council shall meet at least twice each year.

The board consists of five (5) members appointed by the governor for six (6) year terms. At least one (1) member and no more than two (2) members shall be journeymen electricians, at least one (1) and no more than two (2) shall be master electricians, and at least one (1) and no more than two (2) shall be electrical contractors. No two (2) members shall be employed by the same entity and serve on the board. Any member who becomes employed by the same entity as another member during his term of office shall be ineligible to continue as a member of the board. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term. When new appointments are made, the board shall select a chairman, a vice chairman and a secretary. A quorum consists of three (3) members. The board shall meet at least twice each year.

The members of the council and board shall receive compensation, per diem and travel expenses in the same manner and amount as the state legislature while going to, attending or returning from meetings. The governor may remove any council or board member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.3; Laws 1977, ch. 166, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

35-9-103

,

35-9-107

,

35-9-109

,

35-9-111

,

35-9-112

; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 2003, ch. 49, § 2; 2006, ch. 23, § 1; 2010, ch. 84, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to schedule of compensation, per diem and travel expenses for members of the legislature, see §

28-5-101

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, rewrote (c) changing the number of members of the board and modifying restrictions for eligibility.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “a vice chairman” in the sixth sentence of (c).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 23, § 2, provides: “Notwithstanding the six (6) year term provided in W.S. 35-9-103(c), the initial term of one (1) member of the electrical board appointed under this act shall expire on March 1, 2010.”

§ 35-9-104.
State fire marshal; qualifications.

After consultation with the council, the governor shall appoint a state fire marshal who shall be the director of the department and shall have theoretical knowledge and practical and managerial skill and experience which fits him for the position, as determined by the governor.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 185, § 2.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.4; Laws 1977, ch. 166, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

35-9-104

; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; ch. 185, §§ 1, 2.

§ 35-9-105.
Division administrators; qualifications.

After consultation with the council and the governor, the state fire marshal shall appoint:

The chief deputy fire marshal, who is the administrator of the fire prevention division. His qualifications shall be the same as the state fire marshal;

The chief electrical inspector who is the administrator of the electrical safety division. He shall be a master electrician and an electrical inspector certified by the International Code Council or the International Association of Electrical Inspectors.

The chief deputy fire marshal and the chief electrical inspector shall devote full time to the duties of the office and shall be directly responsible to the state fire marshal.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.5; Laws 1977, ch. 166, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 2003, ch. 49, § 2.